Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-515
Courtroom and
office facilities; costs; standards; property transfers from municipal courts;
standards.

Each county shall be responsible for
all costs involved in establishing, furnishing, and maintaining appropriate
courtroom and office facilities for the county court at the county seat. On
July 1, 1985, the courtroom and office facilities of a municipal court shall
be transferred, by sale, lease, or other arrangement, from cities of the metropolitan
or primary class to the county responsible pursuant to this section for the
establishing, furnishing, and maintaining of courtroom and office facilities
for the county court at the county seat. Payments by a city and county on
the bonded indebtedness on any facility constructed for joint use by a city
and county shall continue in the same manner and in the same proportionate
shares as payments made prior to July 1, 1985, subject to any sale, lease,
or other arrangement pursuant to this section. All other property, equipment,
books, and records of the municipal courts shall be transferred on July 1,
1985, to the county court.

The Supreme Court shall prescribe minimum standards for all
courtroom and office facilities. The Supreme Court may establish standards
by class of county, based on population, caseload, and other pertinent factors.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 15;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 10;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 593, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 4.